Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-4408
Good Life District Economic Development Act, how cited.

Sections 77-4408 to 77-4431 shall be known and may be cited as the Good Life District Economic Development Act.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB707, § 8.